src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON X_KARRII !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom:^SV^SLEN K ;       ! karrii 
+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN K ;       ! karrii 
+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN K ;       ! karrii 
+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:%>jân K ;   ! karrijân 
+Sg+Ill:%>i K ;            ! karrij 
+Sg+Loc:%>st K ;           ! karrist 
+Sg+Com:%>in K ;           ! karrijn 
+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá K ; ! karriittáá 
+Ess:%>n K ;               ! karrin 
+Par:%>d K ;               ! karrid 
 
X_SVSLENh_PL ; 
 
! px 14.6.2019 dán rádjái lasihuvvon. XXX 
 
LEXICON S_SPAALVAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
S_ALGAAS_PX ;                      ! XXX check, add -i? 
+N+Sg+Nom:š^WG^RLEN K ; ! spáálváš 
+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:âš^WG^RLEN K ; ! spáálvâš 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:âš^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^SLEN%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:%>i Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN K ;            ! spálváá 
+N+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN K ;            ! spálváá 
+N+Sg+Ill:ž^RVSH%>ân K ;          ! spálvážân 
+N+Sg+Ill+Use/NG:ž^RLEN%>ân K ;   ! spáálvážân 
+N+Sg+Loc:^SV^SLEN%>st K ;        ! spálváást 
+N+Sg+Com:%>in K ;                ! spálváin 
+N+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá K ;      ! spálvááttáá 
+N+Ess:ž^WG%>in K ;               ! spálvážin 
+N+Ess+Use/NG:ž^WG^RLEN%>in K ;   ! spálvážin 
+N+Par:ž^WG%>id K ;               ! spálvážid 
+N+Par+Use/NG:^WG^RLEN%>žid K ;   ! spálvážid 
+N: X_SVSLENh_PL ; 
 
 
 
LEXICON S_TUULAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** ! stem: ku^RVđi 
S_TUULAS_SG ; 
S_TUULAS_PL ; 
:i S_ALGAAS_PX ; 
 
LEXICON X_TUULAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
X_TUULAS_SG ; 
X_TUULAS_PL ; 
 
LEXICON S_TUULAS_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_TUULAS_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:âš^WG^RVSH%> Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN%> Rhash ; 
 
LEXICON S_TUULAS_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_TUULAS_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:^WG^RLEN%>i Rhash ; 
 
LEXICON X_TUULAS_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom:âš^WG^RLEN K ; ! tuulâš 
+Sg+Gen:i^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN K ;        ! tuulii 
+Sg+Acc:i^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN K ;        ! tuulii 
+Sg+Ill:âž^WG^RVSH%>ân K ;          ! tulâžân 
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:âž^WG^RLEN%>ân K ; ! tuulâžân 
+Sg+Loc:i^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN%>st K ;    ! tuuliist 
+Sg+Com:i^WG^RLEN%>in K ;            ! tuulijn 
+Sg+Abe:i^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN%>ttáá K ;  ! tuuliittáá 
+Ess:âž^WG^RVSH%>in K ;             ! tulâžin 
+Par:âž^WG^RVSH%>id K ;             ! tulâžid 
 
 
LEXICON X_TUULAS_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:i^SV^WG^RLEN^SLEN%>h K ;   ! tuuliih 
+Pl+Gen:i^WG^RLEN%>i K ;           ! tuulij 
+Pl+Acc:i^WG^RLEN%>id K ;          ! tuulijd 
+Pl+Ill:i^WG^RLEN%>id K ;          ! tuulijd 
+Pl+Loc:i^WG^RLEN%>in K ;          ! tuulijn 
+Pl+Com:i^WG^RVSH%>i GUIN ;        ! tulijguin 
+Pl+Abe:i^WG^RVSH%>ittáá K ;       ! tulijttáá 
 
 
 
LEXICON S_KAANDAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** stem: ka^RVnd 
S_KAANDAS_SG ; 
S_KAANDAS_PL ; 
:ažâ S_ALGAAS_PX ; 
 
LEXICON X_KAANDAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
X_KAANDAS_SG ; 
X_KAANDAS_PL ; 
 
LEXICON S_KAANDAS_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_KAANDAS_SG ; 
 
LEXICON S_KAANDAS_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_KAANDAS_PL ; 
 
LEXICON X_KAANDAS_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom:â^WG^RLEN%>š K ; ! kaandâš 
+Cmp/SgNom:â^WG%>š  Rhash ; 
+Cmp/SgGen:%>ii  Rhash ; 
+Cmp/PlGen:%>ij  Rhash ; 
+Sg+Gen:%>ii K ; 
+Sg+Acc:%>ii K ; 
+Sg+Ill:âž^WG%>ân K ; 
+Sg+Loc:%>iist K ; 
+Sg+Com:%>ijn K ; 
+Sg+Abe:%>iittáá K ; 
+Ess:â^WG%>žin K ; 
+Par:â^WG%>žid K ; 
 
LEXICON X_KAANDAS_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Pl+Nom:%>iih K ; 
+Pl+Gen:%>ij K ; 
+Pl+Acc:%>ijd K ; 
+Pl+Ill:%>ijd K ; 
+Pl+Loc:%>ijn K ; 
+Pl+Com:%>ij GUIN ; 
+Pl+Abe:%>ijttáá K ; 
 
 
 
 
LEXICON S_KUULMIS !!≈ * **@CODE@** stem kuovtt 
+N+Sg+Nom:iš^WG^RLEN K ;  ! kuulmiš 
+N+Sg+Gen:ii K ;          ! kulmii 
+N+Sg+Acc:ii K ;          ! kulmii 
+N+Sg+Ill:i^WG%>žân K ;   ! ku'lmižân 
+N+Sg+Loc:ii%>st K ;      ! kulmiist 
+N+Sg+Com:i%>in K ;       ! kulmijn 
+N+Sg+Abe:ii%>ttáá K ;    ! kulmišttáá 
+N+Ess:iž^WG^RVSH%>in K ; ! ku'lmižin 
+N+Par:iž^WG^RVSH%>id K ; ! ku'lmižid 
+N+Pl+Nom:ii%>h K ; 
+N+Pl+Gen:i%>i K ; 
+N+Pl+Acc:i%>id K ; 
+N+Pl+Ill:i%>id K ; 
+N+Pl+Loc:i%>in K ; 
+N+Pl+Com:i%>i GUIN ; 
+N+Pl+Abe:i%>ittáá K ; 
:i S_ALGAAS_PX ; 
 
 
LEXICON S_CISSAAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** ! stem: cissá 
+N:  X_CISSAAS ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^SVš^SLEN%>  Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^SLEN%>  Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:%>i  Rhash ; 
+N+Sg+Ill:^SVž^SLEN^SVLOW%>ân K ;              ! cissáážân 
+N+Ess:^SVž^SLEN^SVLOW%>in K ;                 ! cissáážin 
+N+Par:^SVž^SLEN^SVLOW%>id K ;                 ! cissáážid 
S_ALGAAS_PX ; 
 
LEXICON X_CISSAAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** stem čissá
+Sg+Nom:^SVš^SLEN K ;      ! cissááš 
+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN K ;       ! cissáá 
+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN K ;       ! cissáá 
+Sg+Loc:^SV^SLEN%>st K ;   ! cissáást  NEW 
+Sg+Com:%>in K ;           ! cissáin 
+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá K ; ! cissááttáá 
 X_SVSLENh_PL ; 
 
LEXICON S_VUALAAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N: X_VUALAAS; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^SVš^RLEN^SLEN%>  Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^RLEN^SLEN%>  Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:%>i  Rhash ; 
S_ALGAAS_PX ; 
 
LEXICON X_VUALAAS !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom:^SVš^RLEN^SLEN K ;       ! vuálááš 
+Sg+Gen:^SV^RLEN^SLEN K ;        ! vuáláá 
+Sg+Acc:^SV^RLEN^SLEN K ;        ! vuáláá 
+Sg+Ill:ž%>ân K ;                ! vuálážân 
+Sg+Loc:^SV^RLEN^SLEN%>st K ;    ! vuáláást 
+Sg+Com:%>in K ;                 ! vuáláin 
+Sg+Abe:^SV^RLEN^SLEN%>ttáá K ;  ! vuálááttáá 
+Ess:ž%>in K ;                   ! vuálážin 
+Par:ž%>id K ;                   ! vuálážid 
+Pl+Nom:^SV^RLEN^SLEN%>h K ;     ! vuálááh 
+Pl+Gen:%>i K ;                  ! vuálái 
+Pl+Acc:%>id K ;                 ! vuáláid 
+Pl+Ill:%>id K ;                 ! vuáláid 
+Pl+Loc:%>in K ;                 ! vuáláin 
+Pl+Com:%>i GUIN ;               ! vuáláiguin 
+Pl+Abe:%>ittáá K ;              ! vuáláittáá 
 
 
LEXICON S_KUAVDAS !!≈ * **@CODE@**  WG or not? vuáŋŋáš not WG, kiärpáš WG. stem: suábbá 
S_KUAVDAS_SG ; 
S_KUAVDAS_PL ; 
 
!LEXICON X_KUAVDAS   * ''@CODE@''  WG or not? vuáŋŋáš not WG, kiärpáš WG 
!X_KUAVDAS_SG ; 
!X_SVSLENh_PL ; 
 
LEXICON S_KUAVDAS_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N:  X_KUAVDAS_SG ; 
+N+Cmp/SgNom:š^WG^RVSH%>  Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^SLEN%>  Rhash ;  ! piäivááčuovâ 
+N+Sg+Gen:%> VPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Acc:%> VPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Sg+Ill:ž^WG^RVSH%> CPXsuff ;   ! 
+N+Sg+Loc:ást^WG^RVSH%> CPXsuff ; ! 
+N+Sg+Com:%>in CPXsuff ;          ! párnáinân 
+N+Sg+Loc:%>st CPXsuff ;          ! párnáinân 
+N+Sg+Ill:%>s CPXsuff ;           ! párnáinân 
+N+Ess:%>ân CPXsuff ;             ! párnáinân 
 
 
 
LEXICON S_KUAVDAS_PL !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+N:  X_SVSLENh_PL ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:%>i  Rhash ; ! piäivááčuovâ 
+N+Pl+Gen:%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Acc:%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Ill:%>id CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Loc:%>in CPXsuff ;  ! 
+N+Pl+Com:%>id CPXsuffCOM ;  ! 
 
LEXICON X_KUAVDAS_SG !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
+Sg+Nom:^WG^RLEN%>š K ;               ! kuávdáš piäiváš 
+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:âš^WG^RLEN K ;       ! kuávdâš piäivâš 
+Sg+Gen:^SV^SLEN K ;                  ! kuávdáá piäiváá 
+Sg+Acc:^SV^SLEN K ;                  ! kuávdáá piäiváá 
+Sg+Ill:ž^WG^RVSH%>ân K ;             ! kuávdážân piäivážân 
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:ž^WG^RLEN%>ân K ;    !  kuávdážân piäivážân 
+Sg+Loc:^SV^SLEN%>st K ;              ! kuávdáást 
+Sg+Com:%>in K ;                      ! kuávdáin 
+Sg+Abe:^SV^SLEN%>ttáá K ;            ! kuávdááttáá 
+Ess:ž^WG^RVSH%>in K ;                ! kuávdážin 
+Ess+Err/Orth:ž^WG^RLEN%>in K ;       ! páárnážin 
+Par:ž^WG^RVSH%>id K ;                ! kuávdážid 
+Par+Err/Orth:ž^WG^RLEN%>id K ;       ! páárnážid 
 
LEXICON S_ALGAAS  !!≈ * **@CODE@** stem alga 
+N: X_ALGAAS ;
+N+Cmp/SgNom:^SVš^SLEN%>  Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/SgGen:^SV^SLEN%>  Rhash ; 
+N+Cmp/PlGen:%>i  Rhash ; 
S_ALGAAS_PX ; 

LEXICON X_ALGAAS
+Sg+Nom:^SV^EA^SLEN%>š K ;      ! algaaš 
+Sg+Gen:^SV^EA^SLEN K ;       ! algaa 
+Sg+Acc:^SV^EA^SLEN K ;       ! algaa 
+Sg+Ill:^EA^CSH%>žân K ;             ! algažân 
+Sg+Loc:^SV^EA^SLEN%>st K ;   ! algaast 
+Sg+Com:%>in K ;           ! algain 
+Sg+Abe:^SV^EA^SLEN%>ttáá K ; ! algaattáá 
+Ess:^EA^CSH%>žin K ;                ! algažin 
+Par:^EA^CSH%>žid K ;                ! algažid 
 X_SVSLENh_PL ; 
 
 
