src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPxKin !!≈ * **@CODE@**For the moment, kinship words go like NounPx and need not be moved here.
kaandâš+Sem/Hum:ka^RVnd S_KAANDAS ; !YAML !Dimin: kandâ tags_via_apertium
LEXICON NounPx !!≈ * **@CODE@** here we put all normal nouns, as before
tuodâraalaaš+Sem/Plant:tuodâr#aala S_ALGAAS "" ;
viäruvuálááš+Sem/Dummytag:viäru#vuálá S_VUALAAS "" ;
kuuđhâš+Sem/Ani:ku^RVđh S_KAANDAS "" ;
jiägáš+Sem/Dummytag:jiäggá S_KUAVDAS "" ;
náápáš+Sem/Dummytag:ná^RVppá S_KUAVDAS "" ;
palvâlusliinjáš+Sem/Dummytag:palvâlus#li^RVnjá S_KUAVDAS "palvelulinja" ;
tuulâš+Sem/Dummytag:tu^RVl S_TUULAS "lieska" ;
pajekoozâš+Sem/Dummytag:paje#ko^RVzz S_KAANDAS "kamana" ;
pääččimvuálááš+Sem/Dummytag:pääččim#vuálá S_VUALAAS "laukaisualusta" ;
koovááš+Sem/Dummytag:koová S_CISSAAS "kuvake" ;
tieđettemkirjááš+Sem/Dummytag:tieđettem#kirjá S_VUALAAS "esite" ;
čuuskâš+Sem/Dummytag:ču^RVsk S_KAANDAS "nakki" ;
seinitiivráš+Sem/Ani:seini#ti^RVvrá S_SPAALVAS "tupajumi" ;
sierâtáávgáš+Sem/Dummytag:sierâ#tá^RVvgá S_SPAALVAS "leikkijousi" ;
kiäđgáš+Sem/Dummytag:kiäđgá S_KUAVDAS "pikkukivi" ;
koppâvuálááš+Sem/Dummytag:koppâ#vuálá S_VUALAAS "aluslautanen" ;
uccááš+Sem/Dummytag:uccá S_CISSAAS "pienokainen" ;
kuátikuuđhâš+Sem/Ani:kuáti#ku^RVđh S_KAANDAS "ryppyviholainen" ;
pilmááš+Sem/Dummytag:pilmá S_CISSAAS "pannahinen" ;
liestâš+Sem/Dummytag:liest S_KAANDAS "sadin" ;
áálááš+Sem/Dummytag:á^RVlá S_VUALAAS "alasin" ;
aassâmkuávdáš+Sem/Dummytag:aassâm#kuávdá S_KUAVDAS "asutuskeskus" ;
siskiipiälááš+Sem/Dummytag:siskii#piälá S_VUALAAS ;
viiljâš+Sem/Hum:vi^RVlj S_KAANDAS ;
nuubiš+Sem/Dummytag:nu^RVbb S_KUULMIS ;
moonjiš+Sem/Dummytag:moonj S_KUULMIS ;
ucctaakiš+Sem/Dummytag:ucc#ta^RVkk S_KUULMIS ;
siiskiš+Sem/Dummytag:si^RVsk S_KUULMIS ;
siiskiš+Sem/Dummytag:si^RVsk S_KUULMIS ;
siskiš+Sem/Dummytag:sisk S_KUULMIS ;
kuulmiš+Sem/Dummytag:ku^RVlm S_KUULMIS ;
eeniš+Sem/Hum:eenn S_KUULMIS ;
kuuđiš+Sem/Dummytag:kuuđ S_KUULMIS ;
koozâš+Sem/Dummytag:ko^RVzz S_KAANDAS "kynsi (dem.)" ;
ameriktirlihhááš+Sem/Ani-bird:amerik#tirlihhá S_CISSAAS "amerikansipi" ;
aurorapiäivááloddááš+Sem/Ani-insect:aurora#piäiváá#loddá S_ALGAAS "auroraperhonen" ;
ciskeváálláš+Sem/Ani-bird:ciske#vá^RVll5á S_SPAALVAS "ampuhaukka" ;
fiskispuálččimieđâš+Sem/Plant:fiski#spuálčči#mieđ S_TUULAS "keltaängelmä" ;
juhâmieđâš+Sem/Plant:juhâ#mieđ S_TUULAS "jokileinikki" ;
kaalâpiäivááloddááš+Sem/Ani-insect:kaalâpiäiváá#loddá S_ALGAAS "kaaliperhonen" ;
kiirjâgsuájápaaccâhloddááš+Sem/Ani-bird:kiirjâgsuájápaaccâh#loddá S_ALGAAS "kirjosiipikäpylintu" ;
kirjááš+Sem/Txt:kirjá S_VUALAAS "kirjanen" ;	!Dim: kirje tags_via_apertium
kiđđâmieđâš+Sem/Plant:kiđđâ##mieđ S_TUULAS "kevätleinikki" ;
kuolbâmieđâš+Sem/Plant:kuolbâ##mieđ S_TUULAS "aholeinikki" ;
kuávdáš+Sem/Plc:kuávdá S_KUAVDAS "keskusta" ;	! YAML  tags_via_apertium
leibiloddááš+Sem/Ani-bird:leibi#loddá S_ALGAAS "leppälintu" ;
madeiraspáálváš+Sem/Ani-bird:madeira#spá^RVlvá S_SPAALVAS "madeirankeiju" ;
mieđâš+Sem/Plant:mieđ S_TUULAS "leinikki" ;
nuorttâpuájuiloddááš+Sem/Ani-bird:nuorttâpuájui#loddá S_ALGAAS "idänuunilintu" ;
peeccihloostâš+Sem/Plant:peeccih#lo^RVst S_KAANDAS "pyrstölehdykkä" ;
pešnirihhááš+Sem/Ani-bird:pešni#rihhá S_CISSAAS "västäräkki" ;	! tags_via_apertium
puájuiloddááš+Sem/Ani-bird:puájui#loddá S_ALGAAS "lapinuunilintu" ;
pyeidicissááš+Sem/Ani-bird:pyeidi#cissá S_CISSAAS "talitiainen" ;	! tags_via_apertium
párnáipáárnáš+Sem/Hum:párnái#pá^RVrná S_KUAVDAS ; !Dim: pärni tags_via_apertium
pähtispáálváš+Sem/Ani-bird:pähti#spá^RVlvá S_SPAALVAS "kalliopääsky" ;
riššâmieđâš+Sem/Plant:riššâ##mieđ S_TUULAS "rikkileinikki" ;
spáálváš+Sem/Ani-bird:spá^RVlvá S_SPAALVAS "pääsky" ;
stormâspáálváš+Sem/Ani-bird:stormâ#spá^RVlvá S_SPAALVAS "myrskykeiju" ;
säämimieđâš+Sem/Plant:säämi##mieđ S_TUULAS "lapinleinikki" ;
taigapuájuiloddááš+Sem/Ani-bird:taigapuájui#loddá S_ALGAAS "taigauunilintu" ;
termispáálváš+Sem/Ani-bird:termi#spá^RVlvá S_SPAALVAS "törmäpääsky" ;	! tags_via_apertium
tuuvááš+Sem/Build:tu^RVvá S_VUALAAS "mökki" ;	!Dim: tupe tags_via_apertium
tuvvááš+Sem/Ani-bird:tuvvá S_CISSAAS "kyyhkynen" ;
uccâmieđâš+Sem/Plant:uccâ##mieđ S_TUULAS "pikkuleinikki" ;
vuoptâcissááš+Sem/Ani-bird:vuoptâ#cissá S_CISSAAS "töyhtötiainen" ;
vuávláš+Sem/Ani-bird:vuávlá S_KUAVDAS "sirkku" ;
čapisváávláš+Sem/Ani-bird:čapis#vá^RVvlá S_SPAALVAS "pajusirkku" ;
lovesággááš+Sem/Ani-fish:love#sággá S_CISSAAS "kymmenpiikki" ;
